Nebraska, session 109, LB44.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB44 LB44
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-3001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-3001 (1) A prisoner in custody under sentence and claiming a
right to be released on the ground that there was such a denial or
infringement of the rights of the prisoner as to render the judgment void
or voidable under the Constitution of this state or the Constitution of
the United States, may file a verified motion, in the court which imposed
such sentence, stating the grounds relied upon and asking the court to
vacate or set aside the sentence.
(2) Unless the motion and the files and records of the case show to
the satisfaction of the court that the prisoner is entitled to no relief,
the court shall cause notice thereof to be served on the county attorney,
grant a prompt hearing thereon, and determine the issues and make
findings of fact and conclusions of law with respect thereto. If the
court finds that there was such a denial or infringement of the rights of
the prisoner as to render the judgment void or voidable under the
Constitution of this state or the Constitution of the United States, the
court shall vacate and set aside the judgment and shall discharge the
prisoner or resentence the prisoner or grant a new trial as may appear
appropriate. Proceedings under the provisions of sections 29-3001 to
29-3004 shall be civil in nature. Costs shall be taxed as in habeas
corpus cases.
(3) A court may entertain and determine such motion without
requiring the production of the prisoner, whether or not a hearing is
held. Testimony of the prisoner or other witnesses may be offered by
deposition. The court need not entertain a second motion or successive
motions for similar relief on behalf of the same prisoner.
(4) A one-year period of limitation shall apply to the filing of a
verified motion for postconviction relief. The one-year limitation period
shall run from the later of:
(a) The date the judgment of conviction became final by the
-2-

LB44 LB44
2025 2025
conclusion of a direct appeal or the expiration of the time for filing a
direct appeal;
(b) The date on which the factual predicate of the constitutional
claim or claims alleged could have been discovered through the exercise
of due diligence;
(c) The date on which an impediment created by state action, in
violation of the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of
Nebraska or any law of this state, is removed, if the prisoner was
prevented from filing a verified motion by such state action;
(d) The date on which a constitutional claim asserted was initially
recognized by the Supreme Court of the United States or the Nebraska
Supreme Court, if the newly recognized right has been made applicable
retroactively to cases on postconviction collateral review; or
(e) The date on which the Supreme Court of the United States denies
a writ of certiorari or affirms a conviction appealed from the Nebraska
Supreme Court. This subdivision only applies if, within thirty days after
petitioning the Supreme Court of the United States for a writ of
certiorari, the prisoner files a notice in the district court of
conviction stating that the prisoner has filed such petition; or .
(f) The date on which the prisoner reaches twenty-one years of age.
Sec. 2. Original section 29-3001, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-